test/src/morphology/adj-3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives with -is attribut. Adjective derivations are also a part of this test. Adjectives that belong to ÁRMMOGIS,LÅSSÅT, SUOHKAT, TJUODDJE, TJALMEDIBME,BASSTEL, DABÁR, ÁRMMOGIS, UDNODIBME, STÁVAL

Tests:

  Adjective - guojttis: # TJIEGOS
    guojttis+A+Attr: guojttis
    guojttis+A+Sg+Nom: guojttis
    guojttis+A+Sg+Acc: guojttisav
    guojttis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: guojttisabbo
    guojttis+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: guojttisamos
    guojttis+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: guojttisappot
    guojttis+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: guojttisabmusit
    guojttis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: guojttisappusj
    guojttis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: guojttisapputjit
    guojttis+A+Der/at+Adv: guojttisit
    guojttis+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: guojttisvuohta

  Adjective - låssåt: # LÅSSÅT
    låssåt+A+Attr: [låssis,låsså]
    låssåt+A+Sg+Nom: låssåt
    låssåt+A+Sg+Gen: låssåda
    låssåt+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [låsep, låssådabbo]
    låssåt+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [låsemus, låssådamos]
    låssåt+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: [låsebusj,låssådappusj]
    låssåt+A+Der/at+Adv: låssådit
    låssåt+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: [låsebuttjat,låssådapputjit]
    låssåt+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: [låssisvuohta, låssåvuohta]

  Adjective - suohkat: # SUOHKAT
    suohkat+A+Attr: suohkkis
    suohkat+A+Sg+Nom: suohkat 
    suohkat+A+Sg+Acc: suohkadav 
    suohkat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: suohkadabbo
    suohkat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: suohkadamos
    suohkat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: suohkadappusj
    suohkat+A+Der/at+Adv: suohkadit
    suohkat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: suohkadapputjit
    suohkat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: suohkkisvuohta

  Adjective - njárbbat: # SUOHKAT
    njárbbat+A+Attr: njárbbis 
    njárbbat+A+Sg+Nom: njárbbat 
    njárbbat+A+Sg+Ine: njárbbadin
    njárbbat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: njárbbadabbo
    njárbbat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: njárbbadamos
    njárbbat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: njárbbadappusj
    njárbbat+A+Der/at+Adv: njárbbadit
    njárbbat+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: njárbbadapputjit
    njárbbat+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: njárbbisvuohta

  Adjective - tjuoddje: # TJUODDJE
    tjuoddje+A+Attr: tjuoddjis 
    tjuoddje+A+Sg+Nom: tjuoddje 
    tjuoddje+A+Sg+Ela: tjuoddjes 
    tjuoddje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjuoddjep
    tjuoddje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjuoddjemus
    tjuoddje+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: tjuoddjebusj
    tjuoddje+A+Der/at+Adv: tjuoddjet
    tjuoddje+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: tjuoddjebuttjat
    tjuoddje+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: tjuoddjisvuohta

  Adjective - tjuovgadibme: #  TJALMEDIBME
    tjuovgadibme+A+Attr: tjuovgadis
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Nom: tjuovgadibme
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Gen: tjuovgadime
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Acc: tjuovgadimev
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Ill: tjuovgadibmáj
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Ine: tjuovgadimen
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Ela: tjuovgadimes
    tjuovgadibme+A+Sg+Com: tjuovgadimijn
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Nom: tjuovgadime
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Gen: tjuovgadimij
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Acc: tjuovgadimijt
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Ill: tjuovgadimijda
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Ine: tjuovgadimijn
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Ela: tjuovgadimijs
    tjuovgadibme+A+Pl+Com: tjuovgadimij
    tjuovgadibme+A+Ess: tjuovgadibmen
    tjuovgadibme+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    tjuovgadibme+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []
    tjuovgadibme+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: []
    tjuovgadibme+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: []
    tjuovgadibme+A+Der/at+Adv: tjuovgadimet
    tjuovgadibme+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: tjuovgadisvuohta

  Adjective - udnodibme: # UDNODIBME
    udnodibme+A+Attr: udnodis 
    udnodibme+A+Sg+Nom: udnodibme 
    udnodibme+A+Sg+Com: udnodimijn 
    udnodibme+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: udnodabbo
    udnodibme+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: udnodamos
    udnodibme+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: udnodappusj
    udnodibme+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: udnodapputjit
    udnodibme+A+Der/at+Adv: udnodimet
    udnodibme+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: udnodisvuohta

  Adjective - vigák: # BASSTEL
    vigák+A+Attr: vigágis 
    vigák+A+Sg+Nom: vigák 
    vigák+A+Sg+Com: vigágijn 
    vigák+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vigágabbo
    vigák+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vigágamos
    vigák+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: vigágappusj
    vigák+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: vigágapputjit
    vigák+A+Der/at+Adv: vigágit
    vigák+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: vigágisvuohta

  Adjective - dabár: # DABÁR
    dabár+A+Attr: dabáris 
    dabár+A+Sg+Nom: dabár 
    dabár+A+Sg+Gen: dahpara 
    dabár+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: dahparabbo
    dabár+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: dahparamos
    dabár+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: dahparappusj
    dabár+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: dahparapputjit
    dabár+A+Der/at+Adv: dahparit
    dabár+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: dabárisvuohta

  Adjective - fábmogis: # ÁRMMOGIS
    fábmogis+A+Attr: fábmogis 
    fábmogis+A+Sg+Nom: fábmogis 
    fábmogis+A+Sg+Acc: fábmogisáv 
    fábmogis+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: fábmogabbo
    fábmogis+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: fábmogamos
    fábmogis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: fábmogappusj
    fábmogis+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: fábmogapputjit
    fábmogis+A+Der/at+Adv: fábmogisát
    fábmogis+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: fábmogisvuohta

  Adjective - guovtestávval: # STÁVAL and At
    guovtestávval+A+Attr: guovtestávvalis 
    guovtestávval+A+Sg+Nom: guovtestávval 
    guovtestávval+A+Sg+Acc: guovtestávvalav 
    guovtestávval+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    guovtestávval+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []
    guovtestávval+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: []
    guovtestávval+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: []
    guovtestávval+A+Der/at+Adv: []
    guovtestávval+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: []
